Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, HB2765.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Title 41, chapter 8, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended by adding article 6, to read: ARTICLE 6. International trade COMMISSION START_STATUTE41-1391. International trade commission; membership; duties; annual report A. The international trade commission is established consisting of the following: 1. The CHAIRPERSON OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES INTERNATIONAL TRADE COMMITTEE, OR ITS SUCCESSOR COMMITTEE, OR THE CHAIRPERSON'S DESIGNEE, who shall serve as the chairperson. 2. The CHAIRPERSON OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES commerce COMMITTEE, OR ITS SUCCESSOR COMMITTEE, OR THE CHAIRPERSON'S DESIGNEE. 3. THE CHAIRPERSON OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES government COMMITTEE, OR ITS SUCCESSOR COMMITTEE, OR THE CHAIRPERSON'S DESIGNEE. 4. THE CHAIRPERSON OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES appropriations COMMITTEE, OR ITS SUCCESSOR COMMITTEE, OR THE CHAIRPERSON'S DESIGNEE. 5. Two members of the house of representatives who are appointed by the speaker of the house of representatives. 6. Two members who represent the business community in this state and who are appointed by the speaker of the house of representatives. 7. Two MEMBERS WHO REPRESENT THE BUSINESS COMMUNITY IN THIS STATE and who are APPOINTED BY THE chairperson of the international trade commission. B. All appointments shall be made not later than December 31, 2026 and shall be for a term of four years.  All vacancies shall be filled in the same manner as the initial appointment. Appointed members of the commission shall receive compensation as determined pursuant to section 38-611 for each day actually spent in the performance of official duties and are eligible for reimbursement of expenses pursuant to title 38, chapter 4, article 2. C. The commission shall: 1. Annually elect a vice chairperson from among its members. 2. Meet at the call of the chairperson. 3. Advance trade and investment between this state and any country. 4. Initiate joint action on policy issues of mutual interest between this state and ANY COUNTRY. 5. Promote business and academic exchanges between this state and ANY COUNTRY. 6. Encourage mutual economic support between this state and ANY COUNTRY. 7. Encourage mutual investment in the infrastructure of this state and ANY COUNTRY. 8. On or before December 31, 2027 and each year thereafter, submit a report to the speaker of the house of representatives containing the commission's findings, results and recommendations, including recommendations to add additional committee members. END_STATUTE Sec. 2. Title 41, chapter 27, article 2, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended by adding section 41-3034.01, to read: START_STATUTE41-3034.01. International trade commission; termination July 1, 2034 A. The international trade commission terminates on July 1, 2034. B. Title 41, chapter 8, article 6 and this section are repealed on January 1, 2035. END_STATUTE Sec. 3. Purpose Pursuant to section 41-2955, subsection E, Arizona Revised Statutes, the legislature establishes the international trade commission to encourage economic support and investment between this state and any country.